District of Columbia statutes.
42-205

Application and construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the laws with respect to the subject of the chapter among states enacting it.

May 16, 1986, D.C. Law 6-113, § 6, 33 DCR 1996
1981 Ed., § 45-2605.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Conservation Easement Act.